test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kissa_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - tobdo: #KISSA
    tobdo+N+Sg+Nom:  tobdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Gen:  toˊbdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Acc:  toˊbdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Ill:  toobdon
    tobdo+N+Sg+Loc:  tobdoost
    tobdo+N+Sg+Com:  tobdoin
    tobdo+N+Sg+Abe:  toˊbdottáá
    tobdo+N+Ess:  tobdon
    tobdo+N+Par:  tobdod
    tobdo+N+Pl+Nom:  toˊbdoh
    tobdo+N+Pl+Gen:  toˊbdoi
    tobdo+N+Pl+Acc:  tobdoid
    tobdo+N+Pl+Ill:  tobdoid
    tobdo+N+Pl+Loc:  toˊbdoin
    tobdo+N+Pl+Com:  toˊbdoiguin
    tobdo+N+Pl+Abe:  toˊbdoittáá

  Noun - oljo: #KISSA
    oljo+N+Sg+Nom:  oljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Gen:  oˊljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Acc:  oˊljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Ill:  ooljon
    oljo+N+Sg+Loc:  oljoost
    oljo+N+Sg+Com:  oljoin
    oljo+N+Sg+Abe:  oˊljottáá
    oljo+N+Ess:  oljon
    oljo+N+Par:  oljod
    oljo+N+Pl+Nom:  oˊljoh
    oljo+N+Pl+Gen:  oˊljoi
    oljo+N+Pl+Acc:  oljoid
    oljo+N+Pl+Ill:  oljoid
    oljo+N+Pl+Loc:  oˊljoin
    oljo+N+Pl+Com:  oˊljoiguin
    oljo+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊljoittáá

  Noun - osko: #KISSA
    osko+N+Sg+Nom:  osko
    osko+N+Sg+Gen:  oˊsko
    osko+N+Sg+Acc:  oˊsko
    osko+N+Sg+Ill:  ooskon
    osko+N+Sg+Loc:  oskoost
    osko+N+Sg+Com:  oskoin
    osko+N+Sg+Abe:  oˊskottáá
    osko+N+Ess:  oskon
    osko+N+Par:  oskod
    osko+N+Pl+Nom:  oˊskoh
    osko+N+Pl+Gen:  oˊskoi
    osko+N+Pl+Acc:  oskoid
    osko+N+Pl+Ill:  oskoid
    osko+N+Pl+Loc:  oˊskoin
    osko+N+Pl+Com:  oˊskoiguin
    osko+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊskoittáá
    
  Noun - ronno: #KISSA
    ronno+N+Sg+Nom:  ronno
    ronno+N+Sg+Gen:  roˊṇo
    ronno+N+Sg+Acc:  roˊṇo
    ronno+N+Sg+Ill:  rooṇon
    ronno+N+Sg+Loc:  ronnoost
    ronno+N+Sg+Com:  ronnoin
    ronno+N+Sg+Abe:  roˊṇottáá
    ronno+N+Ess:  ronnon
    ronno+N+Par:  ronnod
    ronno+N+Pl+Nom:  roˊṇoh
    ronno+N+Pl+Gen:  roˊṇoi
    ronno+N+Pl+Acc:  ronnoid
    ronno+N+Pl+Ill:  ronnoid
    ronno+N+Pl+Loc:  roˊṇoin
    ronno+N+Pl+Com:  roˊṇoiguin
    ronno+N+Pl+Abe:  roˊṇoittáá

  Noun - potto: #KISSA
    potto+N+Sg+Nom:  potto
    potto+N+Sg+Gen:  poˊto
    potto+N+Sg+Acc:  poˊto
    potto+N+Sg+Ill:  pooton
    potto+N+Sg+Loc:  pottoost
    potto+N+Sg+Com:  pottoin
    potto+N+Sg+Abe:  poˊtottáá
    potto+N+Ess:  potton
    potto+N+Par:  pottod
    potto+N+Pl+Nom:  poˊtoh
    potto+N+Pl+Gen:  poˊtoi
    potto+N+Pl+Acc:  pottoid
    potto+N+Pl+Ill:  pottoid
    potto+N+Pl+Loc:  poˊtoin
    potto+N+Pl+Com:  poˊtoiguin
    potto+N+Pl+Abe:  poˊtoittáá

  Noun - torvo: #KISSA
    torvo+N+Sg+Nom:  torvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Gen:  toˊrvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Acc:  toˊrvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Ill:  toorvon
    torvo+N+Sg+Loc:  torvoost
    torvo+N+Sg+Com:  torvoin
    torvo+N+Sg+Abe:  toˊrvottáá
    torvo+N+Ess:  torvon
    torvo+N+Par:  torvod
    torvo+N+Pl+Nom:  toˊrvoh
    torvo+N+Pl+Gen:  toˊrvoi
    torvo+N+Pl+Acc:  torvoid
    torvo+N+Pl+Ill:  torvoid
    torvo+N+Pl+Loc:  toˊrvoin
    torvo+N+Pl+Com:  toˊrvoiguin
    torvo+N+Pl+Abe:  toˊrvoittáá

  Noun - uddo: #KISSA
    uddo+N+Sg+Nom:  uddo
    uddo+N+Sg+Gen:  uˊdo
    uddo+N+Sg+Acc:  uˊdo
    uddo+N+Sg+Ill:  uudon
    uddo+N+Sg+Loc:  uddoost
    uddo+N+Sg+Com:  uddoin
    uddo+N+Sg+Abe:  uˊdottáá
    uddo+N+Ess:  uddon
    uddo+N+Par:  uddod
    uddo+N+Pl+Nom:  uˊdoh
    uddo+N+Pl+Gen:  uˊdoi
    uddo+N+Pl+Acc:  uddoid
    uddo+N+Pl+Ill:  uddoid
    uddo+N+Pl+Loc:  uˊdoin
    uddo+N+Pl+Com:  uˊdoiguin
    uddo+N+Pl+Abe:  uˊdoittáá

  Noun - muddo: #KISSA
    muddo+N+Sg+Nom:  muddo
    muddo+N+Sg+Gen:  muˊdo
    muddo+N+Sg+Acc:  muˊdo
    muddo+N+Sg+Ill:  muudon
    muddo+N+Sg+Loc:  muddoost
    muddo+N+Sg+Com:  muddoin
    muddo+N+Sg+Abe:  muˊdottáá
    muddo+N+Ess:  muddon
    muddo+N+Par:  muddod
    muddo+N+Pl+Nom:  muˊdoh
    muddo+N+Pl+Gen:  muˊdoi
    muddo+N+Pl+Acc:  muddoid
    muddo+N+Pl+Ill:  muddoid
    muddo+N+Pl+Loc:  muˊdoin
    muddo+N+Pl+Com:  muˊdoiguin
    muddo+N+Pl+Abe:  muˊdoittáá

  Noun - puddo: #KISSA
    puddo+N+Sg+Nom:  puddo
    puddo+N+Sg+Gen:  puˊdo
    puddo+N+Sg+Acc:  puˊdo
    puddo+N+Sg+Ill:  puudon
    puddo+N+Sg+Loc:  puddoost
    puddo+N+Sg+Com:  puddoin
    puddo+N+Sg+Abe:  puˊdottáá
    puddo+N+Ess:  puddon
    puddo+N+Par:  puddod
    puddo+N+Pl+Nom:  puˊdoh
    puddo+N+Pl+Gen:  puˊdoi
    puddo+N+Pl+Acc:  puddoid
    puddo+N+Pl+Ill:  puddoid
    puddo+N+Pl+Loc:  puˊdoin
    puddo+N+Pl+Com:  puˊdoiguin
    puddo+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊdoittáá

  Noun - suddo: #KISSA
    suddo+N+Sg+Nom:  suddo
    suddo+N+Sg+Gen:  suˊdo
    suddo+N+Sg+Acc:  suˊdo
    suddo+N+Sg+Ill:  suudon
    suddo+N+Sg+Loc:  suddoost
    suddo+N+Sg+Com:  suddoin
    suddo+N+Sg+Abe:  suˊdottáá
    suddo+N+Ess:  suddon
    suddo+N+Par:  suddod
    suddo+N+Pl+Nom:  suˊdoh
    suddo+N+Pl+Gen:  suˊdoi
    suddo+N+Pl+Acc:  suddoid
    suddo+N+Pl+Ill:  suddoid
    suddo+N+Pl+Loc:  suˊdoin
    suddo+N+Pl+Com:  suˊdoiguin
    suddo+N+Pl+Abe:  suˊdoittáá

  Noun - purdo: #KISSA
    purdo+N+Sg+Nom:  purdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Gen:  puˊrdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Acc:  puˊrdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Ill:  puurdon
    purdo+N+Sg+Loc:  purdoost
    purdo+N+Sg+Com:  purdoin
    purdo+N+Sg+Abe:  puˊrdottáá
    purdo+N+Ess:  purdon
    purdo+N+Par:  purdod
    purdo+N+Pl+Nom:  puˊrdoh
    purdo+N+Pl+Gen:  puˊrdoi
    purdo+N+Pl+Acc:  purdoid
    purdo+N+Pl+Ill:  purdoid
    purdo+N+Pl+Loc:  puˊrdoin
    purdo+N+Pl+Com:  puˊrdoiguin
    purdo+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊrdoittáá

  Noun - ruŋgo: #KISSA
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Nom:  ruŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Gen:  ruˊŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Acc:  ruˊŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Ill:  ruuŋgon
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Loc:  ruŋgoost
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Com:  ruŋgoin
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Abe:  ruˊŋgottáá
    ruŋgo+N+Ess:  ruŋgon
    ruŋgo+N+Par:  ruŋgod
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Nom:  ruˊŋgoh
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Gen:  ruˊŋgoi
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Acc:  ruŋgoid
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Ill:  ruŋgoid
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Loc:  ruˊŋgoin
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊŋgoiguin
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊŋgoittáá

  Noun - urkko: #KISSA
    urkko+N+Sg+Nom:  urkko
    urkko+N+Sg+Gen:  uˊrko
    urkko+N+Sg+Acc:  uˊrko
    urkko+N+Sg+Ill:  uurkon
    urkko+N+Sg+Loc:  urkkoost
    urkko+N+Sg+Com:  urkkoin
    urkko+N+Sg+Abe:  uˊrkottáá
    urkko+N+Ess:  urkkon
    urkko+N+Par:  urkkod
    urkko+N+Pl+Nom:  uˊrkoh
    urkko+N+Pl+Gen:  uˊrkoi
    urkko+N+Pl+Acc:  urkkoid
    urkko+N+Pl+Ill:  urkkoid
    urkko+N+Pl+Loc:  uˊrkoin
    urkko+N+Pl+Com:  uˊrkoiguin
    urkko+N+Pl+Abe:  uˊrkoittáá

  Noun - puško: #KISSA
    puško+N+Sg+Nom:  puško
    puško+N+Sg+Gen:  puˊško
    puško+N+Sg+Acc:  puˊško
    puško+N+Sg+Ill:  puuškon
    puško+N+Sg+Loc:  puškoost
    puško+N+Sg+Com:  puškoin
    puško+N+Sg+Abe:  puˊškottáá
    puško+N+Ess:  puškon
    puško+N+Par:  puškod
    puško+N+Pl+Nom:  puˊškoh
    puško+N+Pl+Gen:  puˊškoi
    puško+N+Pl+Acc:  puškoid
    puško+N+Pl+Ill:  puškoid
    puško+N+Pl+Loc:  puˊškoin
    puško+N+Pl+Com:  puˊškoiguin
    puško+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊškoittáá

  Noun - ullo: #KISSA
    ullo+N+Sg+Nom:  ullo
    ullo+N+Sg+Gen:  uˊḷo
    ullo+N+Sg+Acc:  uˊḷo
    ullo+N+Sg+Ill:  uuḷon
    ullo+N+Sg+Loc:  ulloost
    ullo+N+Sg+Com:  ulloin
    ullo+N+Sg+Abe:  uˊḷottáá
    ullo+N+Ess:  ullon
    ullo+N+Par:  ullod
    ullo+N+Pl+Nom:  uˊḷoh
    ullo+N+Pl+Gen:  uˊḷoi
    ullo+N+Pl+Acc:  ulloid
    ullo+N+Pl+Ill:  ulloid
    ullo+N+Pl+Loc:  uˊḷoin
    ullo+N+Pl+Com:  uˊḷoiguin
    ullo+N+Pl+Abe:  uˊḷoittáá

  Noun - sutto: #KISSA
    sutto+N+Sg+Nom:  sutto
    sutto+N+Sg+Gen:  suˊto
    sutto+N+Sg+Acc:  suˊto
    sutto+N+Sg+Ill:  suuton
    sutto+N+Sg+Loc:  suttoost
    sutto+N+Sg+Com:  suttoin
    sutto+N+Sg+Abe:  suˊtottáá
    sutto+N+Ess:  sutton
    sutto+N+Par:  suttod
    sutto+N+Pl+Nom:  suˊtoh
    sutto+N+Pl+Gen:  suˊtoi
    sutto+N+Pl+Acc: suttoid
    sutto+N+Pl+Ill:  suttoid
    sutto+N+Pl+Loc:  suˊtoin
    sutto+N+Pl+Com:  suˊtoiguin
    sutto+N+Pl+Abe:  suˊtoittáá

  Noun - mušto: #KISSA
    mušto+N+Sg+Nom:  mušto
    mušto+N+Sg+Gen:  muˊšto
    mušto+N+Sg+Acc:  muˊšto
    mušto+N+Sg+Ill:  muušton
    mušto+N+Sg+Loc:  muštoost
    mušto+N+Sg+Com:  muštoin
    mušto+N+Sg+Abe:  muˊštottáá
    mušto+N+Ess:  mušton
    mušto+N+Par:  muštod
    mušto+N+Pl+Nom:  muˊštoh
    mušto+N+Pl+Gen:  muˊštoi
    mušto+N+Pl+Acc:  muštoid
    mušto+N+Pl+Ill:  muštoid
    mušto+N+Pl+Loc:  muˊštoin
    mušto+N+Pl+Com:  muˊštoiguin
    mušto+N+Pl+Abe:  muˊštoittáá

  Noun - kirkko: #KISSA --
    kirkko+N+Sg+Nom:  kirkko
    kirkko+N+Sg+Gen:  kiˊrho
    kirkko+N+Sg+Acc:  kiˊrho
    kirkko+N+Sg+Ill:  kiirkon
    kirkko+N+Sg+Loc:  kirhoost
    kirkko+N+Sg+Com:  kirhoin
    kirkko+N+Sg+Abe:  kiˊrhottáá
    kirkko+N+Ess:  kirkkon
    kirkko+N+Par:  kirkkod
    kirkko+N+Pl+Nom:  kiˊrhoh
    kirkko+N+Pl+Gen:  kiˊrhoi
    kirkko+N+Pl+Acc:  kirhoid
    kirkko+N+Pl+Ill:  kirhoid
    kirkko+N+Pl+Loc:  kiˊrhoin
    kirkko+N+Pl+Com:  kiˊrhoiguin
    kirkko+N+Pl+Abe:  kiˊrhoittáá
    
  Noun - huilo: #KISSA
    huilo+N+Sg+Nom:  huilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Gen:  huˊilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Acc:  huˊilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Ill:  huuilon
    huilo+N+Sg+Loc:  huiloost
    huilo+N+Sg+Com:  huiloin
    huilo+N+Sg+Abe:  huˊilottáá
    huilo+N+Ess:  huilon
    huilo+N+Par:  huilod
    huilo+N+Pl+Nom:  huˊiloh
    huilo+N+Pl+Gen:  huˊiloi
    huilo+N+Pl+Acc:  huiloid
    huilo+N+Pl+Ill:  huiloid
    huilo+N+Pl+Loc:  huˊiloin
    huilo+N+Pl+Com:  huˊiloiguin
    huilo+N+Pl+Abe:  huˊiloittáá

  Noun - koško: #KISSA
    koško+N+Sg+Nom:  koško
    koško+N+Sg+Gen:  koˊško    
    koško+N+Sg+Acc:  koˊško
    koško+N+Sg+Ill:  kooškon
    koško+N+Sg+Loc:  koškoost
    koško+N+Sg+Com:  koškoin
    koško+N+Sg+Abe:  koˊškottáá
    koško+N+Ess:  koškon
    koško+N+Par:  koškod
    koško+N+Pl+Nom:  koˊškoh
    koško+N+Pl+Gen:  koˊškoi
    koško+N+Pl+Acc:  koškoid
    koško+N+Pl+Ill:  koškoid
    koško+N+Pl+Loc:  koˊškoin
    koško+N+Pl+Com:  koˊškoiguin
    koško+N+Pl+Abe:  koˊškoittáá

  Noun - saŋkko: # ok KISSA
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Nom:  saŋkko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Gen:  saˊŋko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Acc:  saˊŋko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Ill:  saaŋkon
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Loc:  saŋkkoost
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Com:  saŋkkoin
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Abe:  saˊŋkottáá
    saŋkko+N+Ess:  saŋkkon
    saŋkko+N+Par:  saŋkkod
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Nom:  saˊŋkoh
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Gen:  saˊŋkoi
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Acc:  saŋkkoid
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Ill:  saŋkkoid
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Loc:  saˊŋkoin
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Com:  saˊŋkoiguin
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Abe:  saˊŋkoittáá


  Noun - lahko: # ok KISSA 
    lahko+N+Sg+Nom:  lahko
    lahko+N+Sg+Gen:  laˊhko
    lahko+N+Sg+Acc:  laˊhko
    lahko+N+Sg+Ill:  laahkon
    lahko+N+Sg+Loc:  lahkoost
    lahko+N+Sg+Com:  lahkoin
    lahko+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊhkottáá
    lahko+N+Ess:  lahkon
    lahko+N+Par:  lahkod
    lahko+N+Pl+Nom:  laˊhkoh
    lahko+N+Pl+Gen:  laˊhkoi
    lahko+N+Pl+Acc:  lahkoid
    lahko+N+Pl+Ill:  lahkoid
    lahko+N+Pl+Loc:  laˊhkoin
    lahko+N+Pl+Com:  laˊhkoiguin
    lahko+N+Pl+Abe:  laˊhkoittáá

  Noun - šaddo: # ok KISSA
    šaddo+N+Sg+Nom:  šaddo
    šaddo+N+Sg+Gen:  šaˊdo
    šaddo+N+Sg+Acc:  šaˊdo
    šaddo+N+Sg+Ill:  šaadon
    šaddo+N+Sg+Loc:  šaddoost
    šaddo+N+Sg+Com:  šaddoin
    šaddo+N+Sg+Abe:  šaˊdottáá
    šaddo+N+Ess:  šaddon
    šaddo+N+Par:  šaddod
    šaddo+N+Pl+Nom:  šaˊdoh
    šaddo+N+Pl+Gen:  šaˊdoi
    šaddo+N+Pl+Acc:  šaddoid
    šaddo+N+Pl+Ill:  šaddoid
    šaddo+N+Pl+Loc:  šaˊdoin
    šaddo+N+Pl+Com:  šaˊdoiguin
    šaddo+N+Pl+Abe:  šaˊdoittáá

  Noun - pircco: #KISSA
    pircco+N+Sg+Nom:  pircco
    pircco+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊrco
    pircco+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊrco
    pircco+N+Sg+Ill:  piircon
    pircco+N+Sg+Loc:  pirccoost
    pircco+N+Sg+Com:  pirccoin
    pircco+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊrcottáá
    pircco+N+Ess:  pirccon
    pircco+N+Par:  pirccod
    pircco+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊrcoh
    pircco+N+Pl+Gen:  piˊrcoi
    pircco+N+Pl+Acc:  pirccoid
    pircco+N+Pl+Ill:  pirccoid
    pircco+N+Pl+Loc:  piˊrcoin
    pircco+N+Pl+Com:  piˊrcoiguin
    pircco+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊrcoittáá
